Montana, session 2025, LC2228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 15-70-450, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-70-450. Cooperative agreement -- motor fuels taxes. (1) (a) In order to prevent the possibility
of dual taxation of motor fuels purchased by Montana citizens and businesses on Indian reservations, the
department and an Indian tribe may enter into a cooperative agreement. Beginning on October 1, 2025, The the
department may shall, with the concurrence of the attorney general legislature, include as a member members
of the negotiating team a representative of the department of justice legislators who has expertise in Indian
matters represent districts that include an Indian reservation.
(b) Legislators included in the negotiating team must include:
(i) one member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate; and
(ii) one member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house.
(c) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house may appoint additional legislators
who represent districts that include an Indian reservation as needed.
(d) The department's negotiating team must include members of the public from districts and
counties impacted by the agreement in addition to department staff.
(2) The department of transportation shall report the status of cooperative agreement negotiations
to the transportation interim committee in accordance with 5-11-210.
(3) (a) After negotiations are complete and if the legislature is not in session, an agreement must
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2228.1
be presented to the transportation interim committee for review and to provide final recommendations to the
legislature. comment before the final agreement is submitted to the attorney general for approval pursuant to
18-11-105.
(b) A cooperative agreement in accordance with this section is subject to approval by resolution of
the legislature.
(4) On or before June 1, 2026, the legislative audit committee shall direct the legislative auditor to
conduct or have conducted by persons under 5-13-305 a financial audit of all existing cooperative agreements
that were agreed on prior to October 1, 2025, to analyze the current agreement, the formula of calculation, and
the methodology used in determining the amount payable to the tribe.
(5) On or before October 1, 2026, the legislative auditor shall provide audit findings,
recommendations, and a report, if one is written, to the transportation interim committee.
(6) Cooperative agreements negotiated and approved by the legislature in accordance with this
section may not exceed 10 years.
(7) The provisions of this section are not subject to the agreement authority pursuant to 18-11-
105."

Section 2. Section 15-70-451, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-70-451. Tribal motor fuels administration account. (1) There is a tribal motor fuels
administration account in the state special revenue fund.
(2) The department shall deposit in the tribal motor fuels administration account administrative
expenses and refunds deducted under a cooperative agreement provided for in 15-70-450.
(3) The department of transportation or the department of justice may expend the tribal motor fuels
administration account only for the purposes of administering the gasoline tax and providing refunds under a
cooperative agreement."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC2228.1
NEW SECTION. Section 4. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured,
penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****